Hawaii statutes.
§803-47.8 Delay of notification. (a)
A governmental entity may as part of a request for a court order include a
provision that notification be delayed for a period not exceeding ninety days
if the court determines that notification of the existence of the court order
may have an adverse result.

(b) An adverse result for the purpose of
subsection (a) of this section is:

(1) Endangering the life or physical safety of an
individual;

(2) Flight from prosecution;

(3) Destruction of or tampering with evidence;

(4) Intimidation of a potential witness; or

(5) Otherwise seriously jeopardizing an investigation
or unduly delaying a trial.

(c) Extensions of delays in notification may
be granted up to ninety days per application to a court. Each application for
an extension must comply with subsection (e) of this section.

(d) Upon expiration of the period of delay of
notification, the governmental entity shall serve upon, or deliver by
registered mail to, the customer or subscriber a copy of the process or request
together with notice that:

(1) States with reasonable specificity the nature of
the law enforcement inquiry; and

(2) Informs the customer or subscriber:

(A) Information maintained for the customer
or subscriber by the service provider or request was supplied to or requested
by that governmental authority and the date on which the supplying or request
took place;

(B) Notification of the customer or
subscriber was delayed;

(C) The governmental entity or court that
made the certification or determination upon which the delay was made; and

(D) The provision of this part that allowed
the delay.

(e) A governmental entity may apply to the
designated judge or any other circuit judge or district court judge, if a
circuit court judge has not yet been designated by the chief justice of the
Hawaii supreme court, or is otherwise unavailable, for an order commanding a
provider of an electronic communication service or remote computing service to
whom a search warrant, or court order is directed, not to notify any other
person of the existence of the search warrant, or court order for such period
as the court deems appropriate not to exceed ninety days. The court shall
enter the order if it determines that there is reason to believe that
notification of the existence of the search warrant, or court order will result
in:

(1) Endangering the life or physical safety of an
individual;

(2) Flight from prosecution;

(3) Destruction of or tampering with evidence;

(4) Intimidation of potential witnesses; or

(5) Otherwise seriously jeopardizing an investigation
or unduly delaying a trial. [L 1989, c 164, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 200, pt of
§4]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next